Connecticut, session 2026, SB00087.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established within
the Office of Policy and Management a Nonprofit Provider Advisory
Board for the purpose of advising the Governor and the Office of Policy
and Management on the matters set forth in subsection (c) of this
section.
(b) (1) The Nonprofit Provider Advisory Board shall consist of the
following members:
(A) Twelve members appointed by the Governor: (i) One nonprofit
provider of adult behavioral health care, who shall be a nonprofit
provider who contracts with the Department of Mental Health and
Addiction Services; (ii) one nonprofit provider of children's behavioral
health care, who shall be a nonprofit provider who contracts with the
Department of Children and Families; (iii) one nonprofit provider of
services for homeless persons, who shall be a nonprofit provider who
contracts with the Department of Housing; (iv) one nonprofit provider
of services for persons with intellectual disability, who shall be a

Substitute Senate Bill No. 87
nonprofit provider who contracts with the Department of
Developmental Services; (v) one nonprofit provider of services for
persons with co-occurring intellectual disability or developmental
disabilities and behavioral health care needs, who shall be a nonprofit
provider who contracts with the Department of Developmental Services
or the Department of Social Services; (vi) one nonprofit provider of
community justice services, who shall be a nonprofit provider who
contracts with the Department of Correction; (vii) the chief executive
officer of a state-wide association of community nonprofits, or the chief
executive officer's designee; and (viii) five appointments who shall be
at-large appointments;
(B) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the
secretary's designee;
(C) The Commissioner of Children and Families, or the
commissioner's designee;
(D) The Commissioner of Correction, or the commissioner's designee;
(E) The Commissioner of Developmental Services, or the
commissioner's designee;
(F) The Commissioner of Housing, or the commissioner's designee;
(G) The Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services, or
the commissioner's designee;
(H) The Commissioner of Public Health, or the commissioner's
designee;
(I) The Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services, or the
commissioner's designee;
(J) The Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
Public Act No. 26-102 2 of 4

Substitute Senate Bill No. 87
(K) The Commissioner of Early Childhood, or the commissioner's
designee;
(L) The Labor Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee; and
(M) The executive director of the Court Support Services Division of
the Judicial Branch, or the executive director's designee.
(2) The term of each appointed member of the board shall be
coterminous with that of the Governor.
(3) The Governor shall designate an appointee who shall serve as the
chairperson of the Nonprofit Provider Advisory Board.
(c) The Nonprofit Provider Advisory Board shall:
(1) Advise on areas to improve access and the delivery of services by
nonprofit providers;
(2) Identify opportunities for collaboration across state agencies that
promote effectiveness and efficiency of nonprofit providers and
streamline state processes, including, but not limited to, opportunities
to adjust state agency processes and contract expectations to achieve
beneficial outcomes for nonprofit providers and Connecticut residents;
(3) Recommend short and long-term strategies for enhancing the
financial viability of nonprofit organizations, including through
payment reform models, based on identified best practices;
(4) Recommend a standardized workforce data collection system for
nonprofit organizations to measure and compare impact across private
provider services; and
(5) Identify short and long-range opportunities, issues and gaps
pertaining to nonprofit providers that may result from changes in
federal funding or federal policies.
Public Act No. 26-102 3 of 4

Substitute Senate Bill No. 87
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) No insurer shall refuse to
renew any automobile liability insurance policy, as defined in
section 38a-341 of the general statutes, assign any surcharge on any
automobile liability insurance premium or otherwise increase the rate
for a motor vehicle policy solely on the basis that the named insured or
any operator who customarily operates an automobile insured under
the policy is a volunteer driver who provides services, including, but
not limited to, transporting individuals or goods without compensation
above expenses to (1) a corporation, as defined in section 33-1002 of the
general statutes, that is nonprofit, or (2) a charitable organization, as
defined in section 21a-190 of the general statutes.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Public Act No. 26-102 4 of 4